District of Columbia statutes.
38-212

Repealed

Department of School Attendance and Work Permits — Director; appointments.

Repealed.

Feb. 4, 1925, 43 Stat. 808, ch. 140, Art. III, § 2
July 21, 1945, 59 Stat. 500, ch. 321, title V, § 21
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-247, § 2(b), 38 DCR 376
2001 Ed., § 38-208.
1981 Ed., § 31-412.
1973 Ed., § 31-212.